Texas, session 891, HB113.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF TEXAS: SECTION 1.  Section 25.1102(a), Government Code, is amended to read as follows: (a)  In addition to the jurisdiction provided by Section 25.0003 and other law, a county court at law in Hidalgo County has the [concurrent] jurisdiction provided by the constitution and general law for [with the] district courts [court] in: (1)  family law cases and proceedings; and (2)  civil cases regardless of the amount [in which the matter] in controversy [does not exceed $750,000, excluding interest, statutory or punitive damages and penalties, and attorney's fees and costs, as alleged on the page of the petition]. SECTION 2.  The change in law made by this Act applies only to a cause of action filed on or after the effective date of this Act. A cause of action filed before that date is governed by the law in effect immediately before that date, and that law is continued in effect for that purpose. SECTION 3.  This Act takes effect on the 91st day after the last day of the legislative session.